Utah statutes.
52-1-13.   Sureties -- Approval -- Personal surety bond -- Requirements.
In all cases where a bond is required of any public officer in this state,
either a corporate surety bond or a personal surety bond may be given.  Such
bonds shall be subject to approval as provided by law.  No personal surety
bond shall be approved except with two or more sureties and each such surety
shall first make and file an affidavit setting forth that he is a resident and
freeholder within the state of Utah and is worth the sum specified in the
undertaking, over and above all of his just debts and liabilities and
exclusive of property exempt from execution and shall include in such
affidavit a detailed statement of all of his assets and liabilities; and the
making of any material false statement in respect thereto shall constitute a
felony; provided further, that when there are more than two sureties thereon,
they may express in their affidavits that they are severally worth amounts
less than that expressed in the bond if the whole amount of all sureties is
equivalent to double the penalty of the bond.  No premium on any surety bond
with personal sureties shall be paid from any public funds.  The several
boards, courts or officers authorized by law to approve bonds herein referred
to may require sureties on personal surety bonds to justify annually and, in
case of failure to so justify, such boards or officers may require additional
sureties or a new bond.  In case of failure of any public officer to have his
sureties justify when so required or to furnish additional sureties when
required, as herein provided, the board or officer charged with the duty of
approving the bond of such officer shall declare such office vacant within
sixty days after notice personally served upon the officer, and at the
expiration of said sixty-day period such office shall become vacant unless
such sureties justify or additional qualified sureties be furnished within
said period.
